Washington statutes.
RCW 8.04.100

Cases may be consolidated for trial.

At the time of fixing the date for trial by jury in any case the court may, on application of the petitioner, order that any one or more condemnation cases then pending before the court and requiring determination by a jury of the compensation and damages as aforesaid be consolidated and tried before one and the same jury but with a separate award to be made in each case. If necessary, the sheriff, under direction of the court or judge thereof, shall summon as many qualified persons as may be required to complete the jury from citizens of the county where such lands, real estate, premises or other property sought to be appropriated are situated.

[ 1955 c 213 s 5. Prior: 1925 ex.s. c 98 s 1, part; RRS s 894, part.]